Illinois, session 104th, HB4198.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by 5changing Section 43 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 85/43)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 43. Dispensation of hormonal contraceptives, 9including emergency contraception.10    (a) The dispensing of hormonal contraceptives, including 11emergency contraception, to a patient shall be pursuant to a 12valid prescription, or pursuant to a standing order by a 13physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, a 14standing order by the medical director of a local health 15department, or a standing order by the Department of Public 16Health pursuant to the following:17        (1) a pharmacist may dispense no more than a 12-month 18    supply of hormonal contraceptives, including emergency 19    contraception, to a patient;20        (2) a pharmacist must complete an educational training 21    program accredited by the Accreditation Council for 22    Pharmacy Education and approved by the Department that is 23    related to the patient self-screening risk assessment,   HB4198- 2 -LRB104 14071 AAS 27203 b1    patient assessment contraceptive counseling and education, 2    and dispensation of hormonal contraceptives, including 3    emergency contraception;4        (3) a pharmacist shall have the patient complete the 5    self-screening risk assessment tool; the self-screening 6    risk assessment tool is to be based on the most current 7    version of the United States Medical Eligibility Criteria 8    for Contraceptive Use published by the federal Centers for 9    Disease Control and Prevention;10        (4) based upon the results of the self-screening risk 11    assessment and the patient assessment, the pharmacist 12    shall use his or her professional and clinical judgment as 13    to when a patient should be referred to the patient's 14    physician or another health care provider;15        (5) a pharmacist shall provide, during the patient 16    assessment and consultation, counseling and education 17    about all methods of contraception, including methods not 18    covered under the standing order, and their proper use and 19    effectiveness;20        (6) the patient consultation shall take place in a 21    private manner; and22        (7) a pharmacist and pharmacy must maintain 23    appropriate records.24    (a-5) If contraceptives, including emergency 25contraception, are dispensed or delivered to an adult 26individual on behalf of a minor, a pharmacist shall require   HB4198- 3 -LRB104 14071 AAS 27203 b1positive identification of the adult individual if the 2individual is not known to the pharmacist or pharmacy 3employees. The requirement under this subsection (a-5) shall 4not apply if positive identification is not available and a 5pharmacist exercising professional judgment determines that a 6delay in dispensing the contraceptives may be detrimental to a 7patient.8    (b) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 9Section.10    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to 11require a pharmacist to dispense hormonal contraception, 12including emergency contraception, under a standing order 13issued by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 14branches or the medical director of a local health department.15    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the 16contrary, a pharmacist may dispense hormonal contraceptives, 17including emergency contraception, in conformance with 18standing orders issued pursuant to this Section without prior 19establishment of a relationship between the pharmacist and the 20person receiving hormonal contraception.21    (e) No employee of the Department of Public Health issuing 22a standing order pursuant to this Section shall, as a result of 23the employee's acts or omissions in issuing the standing order 24pursuant to this Section, be subject to (i) any disciplinary 25or other adverse action under the Medical Practice Act of 261987, (ii) any civil liability, or (iii) any criminal   HB4198- 4 -LRB104 14071 AAS 27203 b1liability. 2(Source: P.A. 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 3102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.)